Washington statutes.
RCW 19.02.210

Business license account.

The business license account is created in the state treasury. Unless otherwise indicated in RCW 19.02.075, all receipts from handling and business license delinquency fees must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation beginning in fiscal year 1993. Expenditures from the account may be used only to administer the business licensing service program. During the 2015-2017 fiscal biennium, moneys from the business license account may be used for operations of the department of revenue. During the 2023-2025 fiscal biennium, the legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of moneys in the business license account to the state general fund.

[ 2023 c 475 s 921; 2016 sp.s. c 36 s 916; 2013 c 144 s 27; 1992 c 107 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 475: See note following RCW 16.76.030.

Effective date—2016 sp.s. c 36: See note following RCW 18.20.430.

Effective dates—1992 c 107: See note following RCW 19.02.020.